California statutes. Penal Code
A person required to register under this section may initiate a proceeding under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 and, upon obtaining a certificate of rehabilitation, shall be relieved
 of any further duty to register under this section. This certificate shall not relieve the petitioner of the duty to register under this section for any offense subject to this section of which they are convicted in the future.

Any person who is required to register under this section due to a misdemeanor conviction shall be relieved of the requirement to register if that person is granted relief pursuant to Section 1203.4.

(m) For purposes of this section, a discharged person shall include all of the following:

(1) A ward in the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice on or after July 1, 2022, who, prior to discharge, is returned by the division or the chief probation officer of the county to the court of jurisdiction for alternative disposition, specifically due to the statutorily
 required closure of the division. The division shall inform the ward of the duty to register prior to the ward being returned to the court.

(2) A patient described in Section 1732.10 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The division shall inform the patient of the duty to register immediately prior to closure of the division.

(3) A person described in Section 1732.9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall inform the person of the duty to register immediately prior to the person being returned to the court of jurisdiction.

(n) The court of jurisdiction shall establish the point at which the ward described in subdivision (m) is required to register and notify the Department of Justice of its decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 4.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Burglary [458. - 465.]

458.

As used in this chapter, the term “cargo container” means a receptacle with all of the following characteristics:

(a) Of a permanent character and accordingly strong enough to be suitable for repeated use.

(b) Specially designed to facilitate the carriage of goods, by one or more modes of transport, one of which shall be by vessels, without intermediate reloading.

(c) Fitted with devices permitting its ready handling, particularly its transfer from one mode of transport to another.

(d) So designed to be easy to fill and empty.

(e) Having a cubic displacement of 1,000 cubic feet or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

459.

(a) Every person who enters any house, room, apartment, tenement, shop, warehouse, store, mill, barn, stable, outhouse or other building, tent, vessel, as defined in Section 21 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, floating home, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 18075.55 of the Health and Safety Code, railroad car, locked or sealed cargo container, whether or not mounted on a vehicle, trailer coach, as defined in Section 635 of the Vehicle Code, any house car, as defined in Section 362 of the Vehicle Code, inhabited camper, as defined in Section 243 of the Vehicle Code, vehicle as defined by the Vehicle Code, when the doors are locked, aircraft as defined by Section 21012 of the Public Utilities Code, or mine or any underground portion thereof,
 with intent to commit grand or petit larceny or any felony is guilty of burglary. As used in this chapter, “inhabited” means currently being used for dwelling purposes, whether occupied or not. A house, trailer, vessel designed for habitation, or portion of a building is currently being used for dwelling purposes if, at the time of the burglary, it was not occupied solely because a natural or other disaster caused the occupants to leave the premises.

(b) The fact that the structure entered has been damaged by a natural or other disaster, or the extent of that damage, does not preclude conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 533, Sec. 1.   (AB 468)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

459.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 459, shoplifting is defined as entering a commercial establishment with intent to commit larceny while that establishment is open during regular business hours, where the value of the property that is taken or intended to be taken does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950). Any other entry into a commercial establishment with intent to commit larceny is burglary. Shoplifting shall be punished as a misdemeanor, except that a person with one or more prior convictions for an offense specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 667 or for an offense requiring registration pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 290 may be punished pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170. 

(b) Any act of shoplifting as defined in subdivision (a) shall be charged as shoplifting. No person who is charged with shoplifting may also be charged with burglary or theft of the same property.

(History: Added November 4, 2014, by initiative Proposition 47, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

460.

(a) Every burglary of an inhabited dwelling house, vessel, as defined in the Harbors and Navigation Code, which is inhabited and designed for habitation, floating home, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 18075.55 of the Health and Safety Code, or trailer coach, as defined by the Vehicle Code, or the inhabited portion of any other building, is burglary of the first degree. 

(b) All other kinds of burglary are of the second degree. 

(c) This section shall not be construed to supersede or affect Section 464 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 942, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

461.

Burglary is punishable as follows:

(a) Burglary in the first degree: by imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or six years.

(b) Burglary in the second degree: by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 355.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

462.

(a) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to any person who is convicted of a burglary of an inhabited dwelling house or trailer coach as defined in Section 635 of the Vehicle Code, an inhabited floating home as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 18075.55 of the Health and Safety Code, or the inhabited portion of any other building.

(b) If the court grants probation under subdivision (a), it shall specify the reason or reasons for that order on the court record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 162, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

462.5.

(a) Except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to any person who is convicted of a felony custodial institution burglary. In any case in which a person is convicted of a misdemeanor custodial institution burglary, such person shall be confined in the county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served by the granting of probation.

(b) As used in this section, “custodial institution burglary” shall mean a violation of Section 459 on the grounds of any jail or correctional institution with the intent to steal items to use or convert for use as weapons, escape tools, or intoxicating drugs.

(c) If the court grants probation under subdivision (a), it shall specify the reason or reasons for such order on the court record.

(d) Any person convicted of custodial institution burglary shall serve his or her sentence, including enhancements, consecutive to any other sentence in effect or pending. The felony sentence shall be calculated under Section 1170.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1132, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

463.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) “Evacuation order” means an order from the Governor, or a county sheriff, chief of police, or fire marshal, under which persons subject to the order are required to relocate outside of the geographic area covered by the order due to an imminent danger resulting from an earthquake, fire, flood, riot, or other natural or manmade disaster. 

(2) “Evacuation zone” means
 any of the following:

(A) An evacuation area or an area subject to an evacuation warning, as defined in Section 2470.1 of Title 19 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) One or more residential dwelling units in an area identified in subparagraph (A) that is damaged or destroyed by an earthquake, fire, flood, riot, or other natural or manmade disaster,
 for one year after the date an evacuation order or warning went into effect, regardless of whether the evacuation order or warning has been lifted, but does not include detached structures on the same property that are not dwelling units or are not otherwise usable for human habitation.

(C) One or more residential dwelling units
 in an area identified in subparagraph (A) that is damaged or destroyed by an earthquake, fire, flood, riot, or other natural or manmade disaster, and is currently undergoing reconstruction, for up to three years after the date an evacuation order or warning went into effect, regardless of whether the evacuation order or warning has been lifted, but does not include detached structures on the same property that are not dwelling units or are not otherwise usable for human habitation.

(3) “Local emergency” means conditions that, by reason of their magnitude, are, or are likely to be, beyond the control of the services, personnel, equipment, and facilities of any single county, city and county, or city and require the combined forces of a mutual aid region or regions to combat. A “local emergency” shall exist from the time of the proclamation of the condition of the emergency by the local governing body until terminated pursuant to Section 8630 of the Government Code. 

(4) “Reconstruction” includes, but is not limited to, the time from initial debris removal through the issuance of the certificate of occupancy.

(5) “State of emergency” means conditions that, by reason of their magnitude, are, or are likely to be, beyond
 the control of the services, personnel, equipment, and facilities of any single county, city and county, or city and require the combined forces of a mutual aid region or regions to combat. A “state of emergency” shall exist from the time of the proclamation of the condition of the emergency until terminated pursuant to Section 8629 of the Government Code. 

(b) All of the following offenses when committed during and within an affected county in a “state of emergency” or a “local emergency,” or under an “evacuation order,” resulting from an earthquake, fire, flood, riot, or other natural or manmade disaster are looting and, except as provided in subdivision (c), are punishable as follows:

(1) A violation of Section 459, punishable as a second-degree burglary
 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 461, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(2) A violation of Section 487 or subdivision (a) of Section 487a, except grand theft of a firearm, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(3) Grand theft of a firearm, as defined in Section 487, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison, as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 489.

(4) A violation of Section 488 is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for six months.

(c) All of the following offenses when committed during
 and within an evacuation zone are looting and, notwithstanding subdivision (b), are punishable as follows:

(1) A violation of Section 459, punishable as a first-degree burglary pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 461, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of two, four, or seven years.

(2) A violation of Section 459, punishable as a second-degree burglary pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 461, is punishable pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(3) A violation of Section 487 or subdivision (a) of Section 487a, except grand theft of a firearm, is punishable pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(4) A
 violation of Section 602, with the intent to commit larceny, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(5) Notwithstanding Section 490.2, theft from an unlocked vehicle is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170. This paragraph shall not preclude prosecution under any other provision of law.

(d) (1) A person convicted of an offense described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) or an offense described in subdivision (c) who is granted probation shall, as a condition of probation, be confined in a county jail for at least 180 days, except that the court may, in a case where the interest of justice would best be served, reduce or
 eliminate that mandatory jail sentence if the court specifies on the record and enters into the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interest of justice would best be served by that disposition. 

(2) In addition to whatever custody is ordered, the court may require any person granted probation following conviction under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to serve up to 240 hours of community service and may require any person granted probation following conviction of an offense described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) or an offense described in subdivision (c) to serve up to 160 hours of community service.

(3) A person convicted under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) who is granted probation shall, as a condition of probation, be confined in a county jail for at
 least 90 days, except that the court may, in a case where the interest of justice would best be served, reduce or eliminate that mandatory minimum jail sentence if the court specifies on the record and enters into the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interest of justice would best be served by that disposition. In addition to whatever custody is ordered, the court may require any person granted probation following conviction under this subdivision to serve up to 80 hours of community service.

(e) Consensual entry into a commercial structure with the intent to commit a violation of Section 470, 476, 476a, 484f, or 484g shall not be charged as a violation under this section. 

(f) For purposes of this section, the fact that the structure entered has
 been damaged by the earthquake, fire, flood, or other natural or manmade disaster shall not, in and of itself, preclude conviction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 533, Sec. 3.   (AB 468)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

463.2.

(a) In sentencing a person convicted of a violation of Section 463, the court may consider the fact, if pled and proven, that the defendant committed the crime while impersonating emergency personnel as a factor in aggravation in sentencing.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Emergency personnel” means a peace officer, an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, an employee of a public utility or district, state, county, city, or special district, a city and county officer or employee, an officer or member of a
 governmental agency-managed or -affiliated search and rescue unit or team, an officer or member of the Armed Forces of the United States, the California National Guard, the State Guard, the Naval Militia, the national guard of any other state, or any other reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or an emergency medical technician, as defined in Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Impersonating” means willfully wearing, exhibiting, or using of an authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of emergency personnel with the intent of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are emergency personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 545, Sec. 2.   (SB 571)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

464.

Any person who, with intent to commit crime, enters, either by day or by night, any building, whether inhabited or not, and opens or attempts to open any vault, safe, or other secure place by use of acetylene torch or electric arc, burning bar, thermal lance, oxygen lance, or any other similar device capable of burning through steel, concrete, or any other solid substance, or by use of nitroglycerine, dynamite, gunpowder, or any other explosive, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for a term of three, five, or seven years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 357.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

465.

(a) A person who forcibly enters a vehicle, as defined in Section 670 of the Vehicle Code, with the intent to commit a theft or any felony therein is guilty of unlawful entry of a vehicle.

(b) Unlawful entry of a vehicle is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(c) As used in this section, forcible entry of a vehicle means the entry of a vehicle accomplished through any of the following means: the use of a tool or device that manipulates the locking mechanism, including, without limitation, a slim jim or other lockout tool, a shaved key, jiggler key, or lock pick, or an electronic
 device such as a signal extender, or force that damages the exterior of the vehicle, including, but not limited to, breaking a window, cutting a convertible top, punching a lock, or prying open a door.

 (d) A person may not be convicted both pursuant to this section and pursuant to Section 459.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 170, Sec. 1.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Burglarious and Larcenous Instruments and Deadly Weapons [466. - 469.]

466.

(a) A person who possesses a picklock, crow, keybit, crowbar, screwdriver, vise grip pliers, water-pump pliers, slidehammer, slim jim, tension bar, lock pick gun, tubular lock pick, bump key, floor-safe door puller, master key, ceramic or porcelain spark plug chips or pieces, key programming device or key duplicating device, signal extender, or other instrument or tool with the intent to feloniously break or enter into any building, railroad car, aircraft, or vessel, trailer coach, or vehicle as defined in the Vehicle Code, or who knowingly makes or alters, or attempts to make or alter, a key or other instrument named above so that it will fit or open the lock of a building, railroad car, aircraft, vessel, trailer coach, or vehicle as defined in the Vehicle Code, without being requested to do so by a person having the right to open the same, or who makes, alters, or repairs any instrument or thing, knowing or having reason to believe that it is intended to be used in the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, is guilty of a misdemeanor. Any of the structures mentioned in Section 459 shall be deemed to be a building within the meaning of this section.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Key programming device” or “key duplicating device” means any device with the capability to access a vehicle’s onboard computer to allow additional keys to be made, delete keys, or remotely start the vehicle without the use of any key. A key
 duplicating device also includes any device with the ability to capture a key code or signal in order to remotely access a vehicle.

(2) “Signal extender” means a key fob amplifier or other device that extends the signal range of a keyless entry car fob to send a coded signal to a receiver in a vehicle to lock, unlock, access a vehicle, start the engine, or interact with other remote commands associated to the vehicle’s onboard computer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

466.1.

Any person who knowingly and willfully sells or provides a lock pick, a tension bar, a lock pick gun, a tubular lock pick, or a floor-safe door puller, to another, whether or not for compensation, shall obtain the name, address, telephone number, if any, date of birth, and driver’s license number or identification number, if any, of the person to whom the device is sold or provided. This information, together with the date the device was sold or provided and the signature of the person to whom the device was sold or provided, shall be set forth on a bill of sale or receipt. A copy of each bill of sale or receipt shall be retained for one year and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer during business hours.

Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 82, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

466.3.

(a) Whoever possesses a key, tool, instrument, explosive, or device, or a drawing, print, or mold of a key, tool, instrument, explosive, or device, designed to open, break into, tamper with, or damage a coin-operated machine as defined in subdivision (b), with intent to commit a theft from such machine, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

(b) As used in this section, the term “coin-operated machine” shall include any automatic vending machine or any part thereof, parking meter, coin telephone, coin laundry machine, coin dry cleaning machine, amusement machine, music machine, vending machine dispensing goods or services, or moneychanger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1088.)
-------------------------------------------

466.5.

(a) Every person who, with the intent to use it in the commission of an unlawful act, possesses a motor vehicle master key or a motor vehicle wheel lock master key is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Every person who, with the intent to use it in the commission of an unlawful act, uses a motor vehicle master key to open a lock or operate the ignition switch of any motor vehicle or uses a motor vehicle wheel lock master key to open a wheel lock on any motor vehicle is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Every person who knowingly manufactures for sale, advertises for sale, offers for sale, or sells a motor vehicle master key or a motor vehicle wheel lock master key, except to persons who use such keys in their lawful occupations or businesses, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) As used in this section:

(1) “Motor vehicle master key” means a key which will operate all the locks or ignition switches, or both the locks and ignition switches, in a given group of motor vehicle locks or motor vehicle ignition switches, or both motor vehicle locks and motor vehicle ignition switches, each of which can be operated by a key which will not operate one or more of the other locks or ignition switches in such group.

(2) “Motor vehicle wheel lock” means a device attached to a motor vehicle wheel for theft protection purposes which can be removed only by a key unit unique to the wheel lock attached to a particular motor vehicle.

(3) “Motor vehicle wheel lock master key” means a key unit which will operate all the wheel locks in a given group of motor vehicle wheel locks, each of which can be operated by a key unit which will not operate any of the other wheel locks in the group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

466.6.

(a) Any person who makes a key capable of operating the ignition of a motor vehicle or personal property registered under the Vehicle Code for another by any method other than by the duplication of an existing key, whether or not for compensation, shall obtain the name, address, telephone number, if any, date of birth, and driver’s license number or identification number of the person requesting or purchasing the key; and the registration or identification number, license number, year, make, model, color, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle or personal property registered under the Vehicle Code for which the key is to be made. Such information, together with the date the key was made and the signature of the person for whom the key was made, shall be set forth on a work order. A copy of each such work order shall be retained for two years, shall include the name and permit number of the locksmith performing the service, and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or by the Bureau of Collection and Investigative Services during business hours or submitted to the bureau upon request.

Any person who violates any provision of this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) The provisions of this section shall include, but are not limited to, the making of a key from key codes or impressions.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit the duplication of any key for a motor vehicle from another key.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

466.65.

(a) Every person who possesses, gives, or lends any device designed to bypass the factory-installed ignition of a motorcycle in order to start the engine of a motorcycle without a manufacturer’s key, or who possesses, gives, or lends any motorcycle ignition, or part thereof, with the intent to unlawfully take or drive, or to facilitate the unlawful taking or driving of, a motorcycle without the consent of the owner, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Every person who possesses, gives, or lends any item of hardware, including, but not limited to, boltcutters, electrical tape, wirecutters, wire strippers, or allen wrenches, with the intent to unlawfully take or drive, or to facilitate the unlawful taking or
 driving of, a motorcycle without the consent of the owner, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 120, Sec. 1.   (AB 1848)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

466.7.

Every person who, with the intent to use it in the commission of an unlawful act, possesses a motor vehicle key with knowledge that such key was made without the consent of either the registered or legal owner of the motor vehicle or of a person who is in lawful possession of the motor vehicle, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1147.)
-------------------------------------------

466.8.

(a) Any person who knowingly and willfully makes a key capable of opening any door or other means of entrance to any residence or commercial establishment for another by any method involving an onsite inspection of such door or entrance, whether or not for compensation, shall obtain, together with the date the key was made, the street address of the residence or commercial establishment, and the signature of the person for whom the key was made, on a work order form, the following information regarding the person requesting or purchasing the key:

(1) Name.

(2) Address.

(3) Telephone number, if any.

(4) Date of birth.

(5) Driver’s license number or identification number, if any.

A copy of each such work order shall be retained for two years and shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or by the Bureau of Collection and Investigative Services during business hours or submitted to the bureau upon request.

Any person who violates any provision of this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit the duplication of any key for a residence or commercial establishment from another such key.

(c) Locksmiths licensed by the Bureau of Collection and Investigative Services are subject to the provisions set forth in Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 6980) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The provisions of this section shall include, but are not limited to, the making of a key from key codes or impressions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

466.9.

(a) Every person who possesses a code grabbing device, with the intent to use it in the commission of an unlawful act, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Every person who uses a code grabbing device to disarm the security alarm system of a motor vehicle, with the intent to use the device in the commission of an unlawful act, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) As used in this section, “code grabbing device” means a device that can receive and record the coded signal sent by the transmitter of a motor vehicle security alarm system and can play back the signal to disarm that system.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 446.9 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

468.

Any person who knowingly buys, sells, receives, disposes of, conceals, or has in his possession a sniperscope shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

As used in this section, sniperscope means any attachment, device or similar contrivance designed for or adaptable to use on a firearm which, through the use of a projected infrared light source and electronic telescope, enables the operator thereof to visually determine and locate the presence of objects during the nighttime.

This section shall not prohibit the authorized use or possession of such sniperscope by a member of the armed forces of the United States or by police officers, peace officers, or law enforcement officers authorized by the properly constituted authorities for the enforcement of law or ordinances; nor shall this section prohibit the use or possession of such sniperscope when used solely for scientific research or educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

469.

Any person who knowingly makes, duplicates, causes to be duplicated, or uses, or attempts to make, duplicate, cause to be duplicated, or use, or has in his possession any key to a building or other area owned, operated, or controlled by the State of California, any state agency, board, or commission, a county, city, or any public school or community college district without authorization from the person in charge of such building or area or his designated representative and with knowledge of the lack of such authorization is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Forgery and Counterfeiting [470. - 483.5.]

470.

(a) Every person who, with the intent to defraud, knowing that he or she has no authority to do so, signs the name of another person or of a fictitious person to any of the items listed in subdivision (d) is guilty of forgery.

(b) Every person who, with the intent to defraud, counterfeits or forges the seal or handwriting of another is guilty of forgery.

(c) Every person who, with the intent to defraud, alters, corrupts, or falsifies any record of any will, codicil, conveyance, or other instrument, the record of which is by law evidence, or any record of any judgment of a court or the return of any officer to any process of any court, is guilty of forgery.

(d) Every person who, with the intent to defraud, falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits, utters, publishes, passes or attempts or offers to pass, as true and genuine, any of the following items, knowing the same to be false, altered, forged, or counterfeited, is guilty of forgery: any check, bond, bank bill, or note, cashier’s check, traveler’s check, money order, post note, draft, any controller’s warrant for the payment of money at the treasury, county order or warrant, or request for the payment of money, receipt for money or goods, bill of exchange, promissory note, order, or any assignment of any bond, writing obligatory, or other contract for money or other property, contract, due bill for payment of money or property, receipt for money or property, passage ticket, lottery ticket or share purporting to be issued under the California State Lottery Act of 1984, trading stamp, power of attorney, certificate of ownership or other document evidencing ownership of a vehicle or undocumented vessel, or any certificate of any share, right, or interest in the stock of any corporation or association, or the delivery of goods or chattels of any kind, or for the delivery of any instrument of writing, or acquittance, release or discharge of any debt, account, suit, action, demand, or any other thing, real or personal, or any transfer or assurance of money, certificate of shares of stock, goods, chattels, or other property whatever, or any letter of attorney, or other power to receive money, or to receive or transfer certificates of shares of stock or annuities, or to let, lease, dispose of, alien, or convey any goods, chattels, lands, or tenements, or other estate, real or personal, or falsifies the acknowledgment of any notary public, or any notary public who issues an acknowledgment knowing it to be false; or any matter described in subdivision (b).

(e) Upon a trial for forging any bill or note purporting to be the bill or note of an incorporated company or bank, or for passing, or attempting to pass, or having in possession with intent to pass, any forged bill or note, it is not necessary to prove the incorporation of the bank or company by the charter or act of incorporation, but it may be proved by general reputation; and persons of skill are competent witnesses to prove that the bill or note is forged or counterfeited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 295, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

470a.

Every person who alters, falsifies, forges, duplicates or in any manner reproduces or counterfeits any driver’s license or identification card issued by a governmental agency with the intent that such driver’s license or identification card be used to facilitate the commission of any forgery, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 358.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

470b.

Every person who displays or causes or permits to be displayed or has in his or her possession any driver’s license or identification card of the type enumerated in Section 470a with the intent that the driver’s license or identification card be used to facilitate the commission of any forgery, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 359.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

471.

Every person who, with intent to defraud another, makes, forges, or alters any entry in any book of records, or any instrument purporting to be any record or return specified in Section 470, is guilty of forgery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 787, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

471.5.

Any person who alters or modifies the medical record of any person, with fraudulent intent, or who, with fraudulent intent, creates any false medical record, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

472.

Every person who, with intent to defraud another, forges, or counterfeits the seal of this State, the seal of any public officer authorized by law, the seal of any Court of record, or the seal of any corporation, or any other public seal authorized or recognized by the laws of this State, or of any other State, Government, or country, or who falsely makes, forges, or counterfeits any impression purporting to be an impression of any such seal, or who has in his possession any such counterfeited seal or impression thereof, knowing it to be counterfeited, and willfully conceals the same, is guilty of forgery.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

473.

(a) Forgery is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person who is guilty of forgery relating to a check, bond, bank bill, note, cashier’s check, traveler’s check, or money order, where the value of the check, bond, bank bill, note, cashier’s check, traveler’s check, or money order does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), shall be punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, except that such person may instead be punished pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 if that person has one or more prior convictions for an offense specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (e) of Section 667 or for an offense requiring registration pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 290. This subdivision shall not be applicable to any person who is convicted both of forgery and of identity theft, as defined in Section 530.5.

(History: Amended November 4, 2014, by initiative Proposition 47, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

474.

Every person who knowingly and willfully sends by telegraph or telephone to any person a false or forged message, purporting to be from a telegraph or telephone office, or from any other person, or who willfully delivers or causes to be delivered to any person any such message falsely purporting to have been received by telegraph or telephone, or who furnishes, or conspires to furnish, or causes to be furnished to any agent, operator, or employee, to be sent by telegraph or telephone, or to be delivered, any such message, knowing the same to be false or forged, with the intent to deceive, injure, or defraud another, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not
 exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.
